Tennessee, session 114, HB0029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2404, is amended by deleting
the word "chiropractor" wherever it appears in subsection (a) and substituting "chiropractic
physician"; and is further amended by deleting the word "chiropractors" from subdivision (a)(2)
and substituting "chiropractic physicians".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2404(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3)
(A) When a health insurance entity is determining the amount of
reimbursement to be paid pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) or (2) for a service or
procedure that is identified and listed in a nationally recognized services and
procedures code book that is used by the health insurance entity, the health
insurance entity shall not discriminate between a chiropractic physician and a
physician licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 6 or chapter 9, with respect to the
methodology used to calculate reimbursement or the amount of reimbursement.
A health insurance entity shall not attempt to circumvent this subdivision (a)(3) by
creating a chiropractic-specific code or payment methodology not listed in the
nationally recognized services and procedures code book used by the health
insurance entity for determining the amount of reimbursement.
HB0029
000671
- 1 -

(B) This subdivision (a)(3) does not limit the ability of a health insurance
entity to utilize national uniform relative value units (RVUs) that account for the
relative resources used in furnishing a service or procedure.
(C) As used in this subdivision (a)(3):
(i) "Health insurance entity" has the same meaning as defined in
§ 56-7-109; and
(ii) "Nationally recognized services and procedures code book"
includes, but is not limited to, the American Medical Association's Current
Procedural Terminology (CPT) code book.
(D) This subdivision (a)(3) does not apply to:
(i) The TennCare program established under the Medical
Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in title 71, chapter 5, part 1, or a
successor medicaid program;
(ii) The CoverKids program established under the CoverKids Act
of 2006, compiled in title 71, chapter 3, part 11, or a successor program;
or
(iii) Insurance coverage provided by this state or local
governments of this state.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000671